New York, session 2025-2026, A1117.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The judiciary law is amended by adding a new section 512 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 512. Active volunteer firefighters exempt from jury duty. 1. Upon 4 claiming exemption therefrom, a volunteer firefighter, as defined in 5 section three of the volunteer firefighters' benefit law, shall be 6 exempt from jury duty. 7 2. The chief administrator of the courts shall prescribe a form to be 8 used therefor. Any qualified person may file such form with the appro- 9 priate commissioner of jurors who shall thereupon exempt such person 10 from jury duty. Such exemption shall remain valid as long as such person 11 remains a volunteer firefighter. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 13 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amend- 14 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 15 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 16 completed on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01464-01-5